Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-775
Accredited, defined.

Accredited shall mean accredited to render specific types or levels of care according to the Accreditation Manual for Alcoholism Programs of the Joint Commission of Accreditation of Hospitals.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 7.